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DTC P0443/94 Evaporative Emission Control System Purge
Control Vent Control Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
To reduce HC emissions, evaporated fuel from the fuel tank is routed through the charcoal canister to the
intake manifold for combustion in the cylinders.
The engine ECU changes the duty signal to the VSV for the EVAP so that the intake quantity of HC emissions
is appropriate for the driving conditions (engine load, engine speed, vehicle speed, etc.) after the engine is
wamed up.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0443/94 Proper response toengineECUcommanddoesnotoccur
SOpenorshort inVSVcircuit forEVAP
SVSVforEVAP

SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
When using hand−held tester:
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using a hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio was lean or rich, etc. at the time of the
malfunction.

1 Connect hand−held tester and check operation of VSV for EVAP.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch and push the hand−held tester

main switch ON.
(c) Select the ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand−held tester.
CHECK:
Check the operation of the VSV when the VSV is operated by
the hand−held tester.
OK:

VSV is ON:
Air from port E flows out through port F.
VSV is OFF:
Air from port E flows out with hardly through port F.

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .

NG

2 Check VSV for EVAP (See Pub. No. RM630E on page FI−62).

NG Replace VSV for EVAP.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between EFI main relay
(Marking: EFI) and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK



A16785

PRG (+)
ON

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−59

2UZ−FE ENGINE SUP (RM895E)

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

When not using hand−held tester:

1 Check VSV for EVAP (See Pub. No. RM630E on page FI−62).

NG Replace VSV for EVAP.

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal PRG of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the engine room ECU cover.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal PRG of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

NG Check for open and short in harness and con-
nector between EFI main relay (Marking: EFI)
and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

OK

Check and r epl ace engi ne ECU ( See page
IN−1 9) .


